Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1102
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the use of chemigation throughout the state is increasing and that, although chemigation provides a viable alternative to other means of chemical application, if an irrigation distribution system is not properly equipped or if a chemical is not used with proper precautions, there exists a potential to contaminate the water.

The Legislature also finds that complete information as to the occurrences and use of chemigation in this state is essential to the development of a sound state water management policy.

For these reasons, the Legislature deems it necessary to provide the natural resources districts and the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment with the authority to document, monitor, regulate, and enforce chemigation practices in Nebraska.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 28;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 45;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 257.